DI-764
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIAU8-01

DTC Normal | Source Voltage Drop

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The SRSisequippedwithavoltage  -increasecircuit(DC -DC converter) inthe airbag sensorassemblyin
case the source voltage drops.
Whenthe battery voltage drops, thevoltage  -increase circuit (DC -DC converter) functionstoincreasethe

voltage of the SRS to normal voltage.

The diagnosis system malfunction display for this circuit is differ from the other circuits in that when the SRS
warning light remains on and the DTC shows a normal code, source voltage drop is indicated.
Malfunction in this circuit is not recorded in the airbag sensor assembly, and when the source voltage returns
to normal, the SRS warning light automatically goes off.

DTC No. Diagnosis
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Prepare for inspection.
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PREPARATION:

A
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()

Disconnect the negative (-) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

Remove the steering wheel pad (See page SR-7).
Disconnect the connector of the front passenger airbag
assembly (See page RS-32).

w/ Side airbag:

Disconnect the connector of the side airbag assembly RH
and LH (See page RS-45 and RS-60).

w/ Side airbag:

Disconnect the connector of the curtain shield airbag as-
sembly RH and LH (See page RS-70).

Disconnect the connector of the seat belt pretensioner
RH and LH (See Pub. No. RM616E on page BO-212).
Disconnect the connectors of the airbag sensor assembly
(See page RS-81).

Disconnect the connector of the front airbag sensor RH
and LH (See page RS-86).

w/ Side airbag:

Disconnect the connector of the side and curtain shield
airbag sensor assembly RH and LH (See page RS-91).
w/ Side airbag:

Disconnect the connector of the curtain shield airbag sen-
sor assembly RH and LH (See page RS-97).
Disconnect the connector of the seat position sensor as-
sembly (See page RS-102).

Disconnect the front seat inner belt LH connector (See
page BO-131).

CAUTION:

Store the steering wheel pad, front passenger airbag as-
sembly, side airbag assembly and curtain shield airbag as-
sembly with the front surface facing upward.
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2 | Check source voltage.

Airbag Sensor Assembly PREPARATION:
@O N Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery.

Q0 || omes

(@  Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and 1G2
on the airbag sensor assembly and operate electric sys-
tem (defogger, wiper, headlight, heater blower, etc.).

OK:
o = Ho1525 Voltage: 10 - 14V

sor assembly, and check battery and charging
system.

NG> Check harness between battery and airbag sen-

@

3 | Check airbag sensor assembly connector.

CHECK:
ON Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
@ Airbag SensorAssembly | £ and E2 of the airbag sensor assembly connector.
o ] | o

Resistance:0 Q (Continuity)
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nector.

NG> Repair or replace airbag sensor assembly con-
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4 | Does SRS warning light turn off?
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PREPARATION:
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Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

Connect the steering wheel pad connector.

Connect the front passenger airbag assembly connector.
w/ Side airbag:

Connect the side airbag assembly connectors.

Connect the seat belt pretensioner connectors.

Connect the airbag sensor assembly connectors.

g) Connectthe frontairbag sensor connectors.
h

w/ Side airbag:

Connect the side and curtain shield airbag sensor assem-
bly connectors.

w/ Side airbag:

Connect the curtain shield airbag assembly connectors.
w/ Side airbag:

Connect the curtain shield airbag sensor assembly con-
nectors.

Connect the seat position sensor assembly connector.
Connect the front seat inner belt LH connector.

CHECK:

(@)
(b)

Turn the ignition switch to ON.
Operate electric system (defogger, wiper, headlight, heat-
er blower, etc.) and check that SRS warning light goes off.

NO> Checkfor DTCs. If aDTC is output, perform trou-

bleshooting for the DTC. If a normal code is out-
put, replace airbag sensor assembly.

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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